Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 187 Financial Responsibility Law

187.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

187.020.
Suspension and denial of licenses and registration for certain offenses. [Repealed.]

187.030.
When operator or chauffeur need not give proof in own behalf. [Repealed.]

187.040.
Operator’s license and registration certificate to be suspended upon failure to satisfy judgment. [Repealed.]

187.050.
Judgment to be satisfied and proof of ability to pay damages to be fired before future licensing or registration — Nonresidents. [Repealed.]

187.060.
Payments sufficient to satisfy requirements. [Repealed.]

187.070.
Restoration of licenses and certificates upon installment payment or judgment. [Repealed.]

187.080.
Courts to report convictions and orders. [Repealed.]

187.090.
Proof of ability to respond in damages — What is. [Repealed.]

187.100.
Certificate of insurer. [Repealed.]

187.110.
Certificate of insurer of nonresident. [Repealed.]

187.120.
Insurer to notify department of cancellation. [Repealed.]

187.130.
Bond as proof — Clerk to record. [Repealed.]

187.140.
Money or securities as proof. [Repealed.]

187.150.
Department may require further proof of ability to respond in damages. [Repealed.]

187.160.
License, registration certificate and number plates to be returned to department. [Repealed.]

187.170.
Period proof to be maintained — Cancellation of bond or insurance — Return of money or securities — Waiver of filing proof. [Repealed.]

187.180.
Rights of a judgment creditor against bad money or securities deposited with the treasurer. [Repealed.]

187.190.
Motor vehicle liability policy necessary — Express provisions — Operator’s policy. [Repealed.]

187.200.
Liability policies — Implied provisions. [Repealed.]

187.210.
Policies covering vehicles and not operators — Operators’ policy. [Repealed.]

187.220.
Insurance required by other laws unaffected — May be used as proof. [Repealed.]

187.230.
When insurer to issue certificate. [Repealed.]

187.240.
Department to furnish operator’s record and record of ability to pay damages. [Repealed.]

187.250.
Transfer of registration to defeat purpose of this chapter prohibited. [Repealed.]

187.260.
Forgery and operating without giving proof prohibited. [Repealed.]

187.270.
Department to make regulations. [Repealed.]

187.280.
Plaintiff’s rights under this chapter are supplemental. [Repealed.]

187.290.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Cabinet” means the Transportation Cabinet;

“Highways” means every way or place of whatever nature when any part of it is open to the use of the public, as a matter of right, license, or privilege, for purpose of vehicular traffic;

“Judgment” means any judgment which has become final by expiration without appeal of the time within which an appeal might have been perfected, or by final affirmation on appeal, rendered by a court of competent jurisdiction of any state or of the United States, upon a cause of action arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of any motor vehicle, for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person, or for damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use thereof, or upon a cause of action on an agreement of settlement for such damages;

“Motor vehicle” means every self-propelled vehicle which is designed for use upon a highway, including trailers designed for use with such vehicles (except traction engines, road rollers, farm tractors, tractor cranes, power shovels, mopeds, and well drillers) and every vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead wires but not operated upon rails;

“Moped” means either a motorized bicycle whose frame design may include one (1) or more horizontal crossbars supporting a fuel tank so long as it also has pedals, or a motorized bicycle with a step-through type frame which may or may not have pedals rated no more than two (2) brake horsepower, a cylinder capacity not exceeding fifty (50) cubic centimeters, an automatic transmission not requiring clutching or shifting by the operator after the drive system is engaged, and capable of a maximum speed of not more than thirty (30) miles per hour;

“License” means any operator’s license, temporary instruction permit, or temporary license issued under the laws of this state pertaining to the licensing of operators;

“Nonresident” means every person who is not a resident of this state;

“Nonresident’s operating privilege” means the privilege conferred upon a nonresident by the laws of this state pertaining to the operation by him of a motor vehicle, or the use of a motor vehicle owned by him, in this state;

“Operator” means every person who is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle;

“Owner” means a person who holds the legal title of a motor vehicle, or in the event a motor vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease thereof with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee or in the event a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, then such conditional vendee or lessee or mortgagor shall be deemed the owner for the purposes of this chapter;

“Proof of financial responsibility” means proof of ability to respond in damages for liability, on account of accidents occurring subsequent to the effective date of said proof, arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of a motor vehicle in amounts meeting the requirements of KRS

304.39-110

;

“Registration” means registration certificates and registration plates issued under the laws of this state pertaining to the registration of motor vehicles; and

“State” means any state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or any province of the Dominion of Canada.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 118, § 1; 1950, ch. 190, § 7; 1966, ch. 255, § 173; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(7); 1978, ch. 349, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 194, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 2005, ch. 140, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 157, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

187.300.
Administration of chapter — Employment of personnel — Expenses — Action to vacate order or act of cabinet.

The cabinet shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and may make rules and regulations necessary for its administration.

The cabinet may employ additional persons, in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 18A, and incur travel, rental and other current and capital expenses necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

Any person aggrieved by an order or act of the cabinet under this chapter may, within twenty (20) days after notice thereof, bring an action against the cabinet in the Circuit Court of the county in which the accident or violation of law upon which the action of the cabinet was based occurred to vacate or set aside the order or action of the cabinet on the ground that it is unlawful or unreasonable. The answer of the cabinet shall be served and filed within twenty (20) days after service of the complaint. The action shall then be at issue and stand ready for trial upon ten (10) days’ notice to either party. The answer need not deny verbatim the allegations of the complaint, but a general denial thereof on behalf of the cabinet is sufficient. The filing of the action does not suspend the order or act of the cabinet unless a stay thereof is granted by the court pending final determination of the review. Injunctive relief may also be granted by the court in the manner and upon the terms provided by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 118, § 2; 1966, ch. 255, § 174.

187.310.
Certified abstract of operating record of motorist.

The cabinet shall, upon request, furnish any person a certified abstract of the operating record of any person subject to the provisions of KRS

187.290

to

187.620

. The abstract shall designate the motor vehicles, if any, registered in the name of the person. If there is not a record of the person being convicted of violating any law relating to the operation of a motor vehicle, or of any injury or damage caused by the person, the department shall so certify on the abstract.

The certified abstract shall not include information concerning any violation of the law, injury, or damage that occurred earlier than three (3) years prior to the request. The abstracts shall not be admissible as evidence in any action for damages or criminal proceedings arising out of a motor vehicle accident. The certified abstract shall not include accident reports filed with the Department of Kentucky State Police under KRS

189.635

, and shall not include suspension orders of a student who has had his or her operator’s license, permit, or privilege to operate a motor vehicle revoked or denied for being academically deficient pursuant to KRS

159.051

if the suspension has been lifted by the reinstatement of academic eligibility pursuant to KRS

159.051

. The cabinet shall not furnish to any person the accident report of a driver other than himself or herself. This section shall in no way preclude the right of any court of law, law enforcement officer, or attorney representing the individual affected from securing full and complete information concerning the record of that individual.

Insurance companies issuing motor vehicle policies in the Commonwealth shall be prohibited from raising a policyholder’s rates solely because the policyholder has a dependent whose license has been revoked or denied for being academically deficient pursuant to KRS

159.051

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 118, § 3; 1978, ch. 83, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 50, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 34, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 85, § 208, effective June 26, 2007.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A person’s driving history will contain records of his traffic offenses and of his reported accidents and these records are subject to public inspection.

OAG 77-191

.

One may review the driving records of specific individuals where these records go beyond three years but less than the five-year time limit expressed by the General Assembly; however, this review excludes records of violations prohibited by this section.

OAG 89-78

.

187.320.
Report of accident — Failure to report. [Repealed.]

187.330.
Security required following accident — Effect of failure to deposit — Bond or policy as security. [Repealed.]

187.340.
Exceptions to requirement of security or suspension. [Repealed.]

187.350.
Duration of suspension. [Repealed.]

187.360.
Unlicensed drivers of unregistered vehicles. [Repealed.]

187.370.
Form and amount of security — Reduction of amount. [Repealed.]

187.380.
Custody, application or return of security. [Repealed.]

187.390.
Matters not to be evidence in civil action for damages. [Repealed.]

187.400.
Courts to report on unpaid judgments and convictions.

Whenever any person fails within sixty (60) days to satisfy any judgment, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the court in which any such judgment is rendered within this state to forward to the cabinet immediately after the expiration of said sixty (60) days a certified copy of such judgment. If the defendant named in any certified copy of a judgment reported to the cabinet is a nonresident, the cabinet shall transmit a certified copy of the judgment to the official in charge of the issuance of licenses and registration certificates of the state of which the defendant is a resident.

The clerk of the court in which any conviction for violation of a motor vehicle law is rendered, or in which a person charged with violation of a motor vehicle law has pleaded guilty or forfeited bail, shall forward immediately to the cabinet a certified copy of the judgment, order or record of other action of the court. This copy shall be prima facie evidence of the conviction, plea or other action stated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 118, § 12; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 176, effective January 2, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Department of Public Safety (now Transportation Cabinet) has neither the duty nor the authority under KRS 187.410(1) to suspend the operating privileges of a person for failure to pay a fine and court costs upon conviction for violation of a motor vehicle law.

OAG 64-673

.

187.410.
Suspension for nonpayment of judgment — Exception.

Upon the receipt of a certified copy of a judgment, the cabinet shall forthwith suspend (except as provided in KRS

187.440

) the license and registration and the nonresident’s operating privilege of any person against whom such judgment was rendered.

If the judgment creditor consents in writing, in such form as the cabinet may prescribe, that the judgment debtor be allowed license and registration or nonresident’s operating privilege, the same may be allowed by the cabinet, in its discretion, for six (6) months from the date of such consent and thereafter until such consent is revoked in writing, notwithstanding default in the payment of such judgment, or of any installments thereof prescribed in KRS

187.440

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 118, § 13; 1978, ch. 434, § 4, effective June 17, 1978.

187.420.
Duration of suspension.

Such license, registration and nonresident’s operating privilege shall (except as provided in KRS

187.440

) remain so suspended and shall not be renewed, nor shall any such license or registration be thereafter issued in the name of such person, including any such person not previously licensed, unless and until every such judgment is stayed, satisfied or discharged.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 118, § 14; 1978, ch. 434, § 5, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Department of Public Safety (now Transportation Cabinet) has neither the duty nor the authority under KRS 187.410(1) to suspend the operating privileges of a person for failure to pay a fine and court costs upon conviction for violation of a motor vehicle law.

OAG 64-673

.

Given the decision of the United States Supreme Court in the case of Perez v. Campbell (1971), 402 U.S. 637, 91 Sup. Ct. 1704, 29 L. Ed. 2d 233, 1971 U.S. LEXIS 127, which held that a state statute could not frustrate the purposes of the federal bankruptcy laws which include giving a debtor a new opportunity in life, the Department of Public Safety (now Transportation Cabinet) may not suspend a bankrupt judgment debtor’s driver’s license.

OAG 72-755

.

Acts 1978, Chapter 434 as enrolled (without house amendment number 6) and signed by the presiding officers of both Houses and which became law without the Governor’s signature represents the law on the question as enacted at the 1978 General Assembly.

OAG 78-283

.

187.430.
What constitutes satisfaction of judgment.

Judgments in excess of the amounts specified in KRS

187.290

(11) shall, for the purpose of KRS

187.290

to

187.620

, be deemed satisfied when payments in the amount so specified have been credited thereon; provided, however, payments made in settlement of any claims because of bodily injury, death or property damage arising from a motor vehicle accident shall be credited in reduction of the respective amounts so specified.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 118, § 15.

187.440.
Installment payment of judgment — Default.

A judgment debtor upon due notice to the judgment creditor may apply to the court in which such judgment was rendered for the privilege of paying such judgment in installments and the court, in its discretion and without prejudice to any other legal remedies which the judgment creditor may have, may so order and fix the amounts and times of payment of the installments.

The cabinet shall not suspend a license, registration or a nonresident’s operating privilege, and shall restore any license, registration or nonresident’s operating privilege suspended following nonpayment of a judgment, when the judgment debtor gives proof of financial responsibility and obtains such an order permitting the payment of such judgment in installments, and while the payment of any said installment is not in default.

In the event the judgment debtor fails to pay any installment as specified by such order, then upon notice of such default, the cabinet shall forthwith suspend the license, registration or nonresident’s operating privilege of the judgment debtor until such judgment is satisfied as provided in KRS

187.290

to

187.620

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 118, § 16.

187.450.
Proof of financial responsibility required upon certain convictions. [Repealed.]

187.460.
Methods of giving proof. [Repealed.]

187.470.
Certificate of insurance proof. [Repealed.]

187.480.
Certificate of insurance from nonresident. [Repealed.]

187.490.
Motor vehicle liability policy — Definitions — Requirements — Coverage — Implied provisions. [Repealed.]

187.500.
Notice of cancellation or termination of certified policy. [Repealed.]

187.510.
Other automobile insurance policies not affected. [Repealed.]

187.520.
Surety or real estate bond as proof — Lien — Action on. [Repealed.]

187.530.
Cash or securities required as proof. [Repealed.]

187.540.
Owner may give proof for operator. [Repealed.]

187.550.
Substitution of proof. [Repealed.]

187.560.
Department may require further proof. [Repealed.]

187.570.
Circumstances authorizing cancellation or termination of certified policy. [Repealed.]

187.580.
Transfer or reregistration of suspended registration.

If an owner’s registration has been suspended hereunder, such registration shall not be transferred nor the motor vehicle in respect of which such registration was issued registered in any other name until the cabinet is satisfied that such transfer of registration is proposed in good faith and not for the purpose or with the effect of defeating the purposes of KRS

187.290

to

187.620

. Nothing in this section shall be held to apply to or affect the registration of any motor vehicle sold by a person who, pursuant to the terms or conditions of any written instrument giving a right of repossession, has exercised such right and has repossessed such motor vehicle from a person whose registration has been suspended under the provisions of KRS

187.290

to

187.620

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 118, § 30.

187.590.
Surrender of license and registration certificates.

Any person whose license or registration shall have been suspended as provided in KRS

187.290

to

187.620

, or whose policy of insurance or bond, when required under KRS

187.290

to

187.620

, shall have been canceled or terminated, or who shall neglect to furnish other proof upon request of the cabinet shall immediately return his license and registration to the cabinet. If any person shall fail to return to the cabinet the license or registration as provided herein, the cabinet shall forthwith direct any peace officer to secure possession thereof and return the same to the cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 118, § 31.

187.600.
Self-insurance.

Any person in whose name more than twenty-five (25) motor vehicles are registered may qualify as a self-insurer by obtaining a certificate of self-insurance issued by the cabinet as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

The cabinet may, in its discretion, upon the application of such a person, issue a certificate of self-insurance when it is satisfied that the person is possessed and will continue to be possessed of ability to pay judgments obtained against the person.

The cabinet may upon reasonable grounds cancel a certificate of self-insurance subject to the certificate holder being afforded the opportunity for a hearing to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. Failure to pay any judgment within thirty (30) days after the judgment becomes final constitutes a reasonable ground for the cancellation of a certificate of self-insurance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 118, § 34; 1996, ch. 318, § 74, effective July 15, 1996.

187.610.
Government-owned vehicles.

KRS

187.290

to

187.620

shall not apply with respect to any motor vehicle owned by the United States, this state or any political subdivision of this state or any municipality therein; nor with respect to any motor vehicle which is subject to the requirements of KRS Chapter 281.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 118, § 33; 1980, ch. 188, § 143, effective July 15, 1980.

187.620.
Chapter is supplemental.

KRS

187.290

to

187.620

shall in no respect be considered as a repeal of any other state motor vehicle laws but shall be construed as supplemental thereto.

Nothing in KRS

187.290

to

187.620

shall be construed as preventing the plaintiff in any action at law from relying for relief upon the other processes provided by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 118, §§ 35, 37.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Motor vehicle liability insurance — Conditions,
KRS

164.287

.

187.630.
Date of application of chapter — Former statutes. [Repealed.]

187.640.
Insurance covering operation of rented vehicles. [Repealed.]

187.650.
Insurance policy to show that public liability insurance not included.

Whenever an automobile dealer or bank or other lending institution which handles automobile loans procures a policy of insurance for the purchaser of an automobile, new or used, if such policy does not cover the insured as to public liability insurance, then such person or institution shall cause to be stamped or written on the face of the purchaser’s copy of such policy a statement that such policy does not cover bodily injury or property damage insurance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 148, § 1, effective June 17, 1954.

187.990.
Penalties.

Any person whose license or registration or nonresident’s operating privilege has been suspended or revoked under KRS

187.290

to

187.620

and who, during such suspension or revocation drives any motor vehicle upon any highway or knowingly permits any motor vehicle owned by such person to be operated by another upon any highway, except as permitted under KRS

187.290

to

187.620

, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not exceeding six (6) months, or both.

Any person willfully failing to return license or registration as required in KRS

187.590

shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not to exceed thirty (30) days, or both.

Any person who shall forge or, without authority, sign any evidence of proof of financial responsibility, or who files or offers for filing any such notice or evidence of proof knowing or having reason to believe that it is forged or signed without authority, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned not more than one (1) year, or both.

Any person who shall violate any provision of KRS

187.290

to

187.620

for which no penalty is otherwise provided shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

Any person who shall violate the provisions of KRS

187.650

shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisoned not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 118, § 32; 1954, ch. 148, § 2; amend. Acts 1962, ch. 210, § 26.